aspell/se_affix.dat
# This is manually created affix file for North Sami
# For some reason, utf-8 characters don't work. Rules with
# utf-8 characters are commented out (at least some of them),
# for time being.

SET l_se

PFX A Y 9
PFX A   0                   Lulle-                 .
PFX A   0                   Lulli-                 .
PFX A   0                   Lullinuorta-           .
PFX A   0                   Máttá-                 .
PFX A   0                   Davvi-                 .
PFX A   0                   Oarje-                 .
PFX A   0                   Oarjel-                .
PFX A   0                   Nuorta-                .
PFX A   0                   Ođđa-                  .

PFX B Y 1
PFX B   0                   ii-                    .

#Sámi placenames
SFX D Y 9
#basic
SFX D	0				n						[aeiouá]
#SFX D	a				ii						a
SFX D	i				ái						i
SFX D   0               i                       	[eá]
#cg
SFX D	0				id						[aeiouá]
SFX D	0				ide						[aeiouá]
SFX D	0				iguin					[aeiouá]
SFX D	0				in						[aeiouá]
SFX D	0				s						[aeiouá]
SFX D	0				t						[aeiouá]

#Plural sámi placenames
SFX d Y	8
SFX d	n				0						n
#cg
SFX d	0				t						[aeiouá]
SFX d	a				ii						a
SFX d	a				iid						a
SFX d	a				iidda					a
SFX d	a				iiguin					a
SFX d	a				iin						a
SFX d	a				is						a

# ACCRA & LONDON
SFX E Y 43
SFX E   0                   n                       [aeiouáäöåyAEIOUÁÄÖÅY]
SFX E   0                   s                       [aeiouáäöåyAEIOUÁÄÖÅY]
SFX E   0                   t                       [aeiouáäöåyAEIOUÁÄÖÅY]
SFX E   e                   ii                      e
SFX E   e                   iin                     e
SFX E   e                   iid                     e
SFX E   e                   iide                    e
SFX E   e                   iiguin                  e
SFX E   0                   i                       [aeiouáäöåyAEIOUÁÄÖÅY]
SFX E   0                   in                      [aeiouáäöåyAEIOUÁÄÖÅY]
SFX E   0                   id                      [aeiouáäöåyAEIOUÁÄÖÅY]
SFX E   0                   ide                     [aeiouáäöåyAEIOUÁÄÖÅY]
SFX E   0                   iguin                   [aeiouáäöåyAEIOUÁÄÖÅY]
SFX E   0                   a                       [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   at                      [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   is                      [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   in                      [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   ii                      [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   iin                     [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   iid                     [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   iidda                   [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   iiguin                  [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   -a                      [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   -at                     [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   -is                     [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   -in                     [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   -ii                     [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   -iin                    [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   -iid                    [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   -iidda                  [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   -iiguin                 [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   -i                      [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   :a                      [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   :at                     [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   :is                     [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   :in                     [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   :ii                     [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   :iin                    [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   :iid                    [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   :iidda                  [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   :iiguin                 [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   :i                      [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]
SFX E   0                   :s                      [^aeiouáAEIOUÁ]


# NYSTØ & C-FI-NEN & CNAME
SFX F Y 69
SFX F   0                   a                       .
SFX F   0                   an                      .
SFX F   0                   at                      .
SFX F   0                   as                      .
SFX F   0                   ai                      [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   ain                     .
SFX F   0                   aid                     [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   aide                    [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   aiguin                  [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   ii                      [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   in                      [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   is                      [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   iin                     [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   iid                     [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   iidda                   [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   iiguin                  [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   :a                       .
SFX F   0                   :an                      .
SFX F   0                   :at                      .
SFX F   0                   :as                      .
SFX F   0                   :ai                      [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   :ain                     .
SFX F   0                   :aid                     [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   :aide                    [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   :aiguin                  [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   :s                      .
SFX F   0                   :i                       [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   :ii                      [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   :in                      [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   :is                      [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   :iin                     [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   :iid                     [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   :iidda                   [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   :iiguin                  [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   -a                       .
SFX F   0                   -an                      .
SFX F   0                   -at                      .
SFX F   0                   -as                      .
SFX F   0                   -ai                      [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   -ain                     .
SFX F   0                   -aid                     [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   -aide                    [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   -aiguin                  [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   -i                       [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   -ii                      [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   -in                      [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   -is                      [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   -iin                     [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   -iid                     [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   -iidda                   [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   -iiguin                  [^aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   'a                       [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   'an                      [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   'at                      [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   'as                      [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   'ai                      [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   'ain                     [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   'aid                     [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   'aide                    [aeiouyø]
SFX F   0                   'aiguin                  [aeiouyø]
SFX F   nen                 sa                       nen
SFX F   nen                 sat                      nen
SFX F   nen                 sis                      nen
SFX F   nen                 sin                      nen
SFX F   nen                 sii                      nen
SFX F   nen                 siin                     nen
SFX F   nen                 siid                     nen
SFX F   nen                 siidda                   nen
SFX F   nen                 siiguin                  nen

# BERN
SFX G Y 18
SFX G   0                   a                       .
SFX G   0                   an                      .
SFX G   0                   as                      .
SFX G   0                   ain                     .
SFX G   0                   ii                      .
SFX G   0                   -a                      .
SFX G   0                   -an                     .
SFX G   0                   -as                     .
SFX G   0                   -ain                    .
SFX G   0                   -ii                     .
SFX G   0                   -i                      .
SFX G   0                   :a                      .
SFX G   0                   :an                     .
SFX G   0                   :as                     .
SFX G   0                   :ain                    .
SFX G   0                   :ii                     .
SFX G   0                   :i                      .
SFX G   0                   :s                      .
